Tennessee statutes. Title 59 Mines And Mining
Part 2

Certification

59-4-201. Evidence of qualifications — Fees — Temporary permits.

Before the issuance of certificates to any applicant, the applicant must give satisfactory evidence to the commissioner of labor and workforce development or the commissioner's authorized representative of the applicant's good conduct, honesty, capability, and sobriety, and shall pay the commissioner or the commissioner's authorized representative for the use and benefit of the state the following fees:

For conducting the examination (to be paid when examination is held) twenty-five dollars ($25.00); and

For issuance and registration of the certificates, twenty-five dollars ($25.00) to be paid when issued.

All fees collected by virtue of this section shall be reported and paid into the state treasury at the end of the month during which the collections are made by the commissioner or the commissioner's authorized representative, to be placed to the credit of the department of labor and workforce development.

The commissioner or the commissioner's designee may examine any applicant for a temporary certificate of qualifications, upon request, and if such applicant is found to be competent, the applicant may be issued a temporary permit to act as mine foreman thereunder until the next mine foreman examination is held, when the temporary permit shall expire. Only one (1) such temporary permit shall be issued to any applicant. As a condition for the issuance of a temporary permit, the commissioner or the commissioner's authorized representative is authorized to examine applicants to determine if they are qualified to test for methane with an approved detector.

Acts 1915, ch. 169, § 14; Shan., § 3079a106; mod. Code 1932, § 5589; Acts 1953, ch. 86, § 29 (Williams, §§ 5589, 5638.29); Acts 1955, ch. 238, § 6; 1971, ch. 38, § 1; 1972, ch. 458, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 58-404; Acts 1985, ch. 288, §§ 23-25; 1992, ch. 574, §§ 4, 5; 1999, ch. 520, § 43; 2000, ch. 810, § 1; 2016, ch. 599, § 7.

Compiler’s Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 599, § 7, provided that references to the elevator division, division of mines, labor standards division, and division of boiler and elevator inspection, are to be changed to the department of labor and workforce development as sections are amended and volumes are replaced.

59-4-202. Reports to secretary of state — Certification of applicants.

The commissioner of labor and workforce development shall report the commissioner's action to the secretary of state and shall certify to the qualifications of each applicant who satisfactorily passed the examination.

Acts 1915, ch. 169, § 13; Shan., § 3079a102; Code 1932, § 5585; Acts 1953, ch. 86, § 25 (Williams, §§ 5585, 5638.25); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 58-405; Acts 1992, ch. 574, § 6; 1999, ch. 520, § 43.

59-4-203. Contents of certificate — Record by secretary of state.

The certificate shall contain the full name, age, social security number, and place of birth of the applicant; also the length and nature of the applicant's previous experience in and about coal and other mines; and the secretary of state shall, without cost, keep a record in the secretary of state's office of all certificates issued.

Acts 1915, ch. 169, § 14; Shan., § 3079a105; Code 1932, § 5588; Acts 1953, ch. 86, § 28 (Williams, §§ 5588, 5638.28); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 58-406; Acts 1985, ch. 288, § 26.

59-4-204. Revocation of certificate.

The commissioner of labor and workforce development or the commissioner's authorized representative may, upon a written complaint, investigate a mine foreman to whom a certificate has been issued under this chapter, and may revoke a mine foreman certificate upon a finding that the holder has been guilty of incompetence in the performance of the holder's duties or for any cause for which issuance of a certificate could have been refused had it been known to the commissioner or the commissioner's authorized representative at the time of issuance; provided, that a holder of a certificate shall be given ten (10) days notice from the commissioner or the commissioner's authorized representative to appear before the commissioner or the commissioner's authorized representative to show cause why such certificate should not be revoked.

The Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, governs the conduct of all proceedings before the commissioner or the commissioner's authorized representative in the revocation of mine foreman certificates.

Acts 1915, ch. 13, § 4; 1915, ch. 169, § 13; Shan., § 3079a103; Code 1932, § 5586; Acts 1953, ch. 86, § 26 (Williams, §§ 5586, 5638.26); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 58-407; Acts 1985, ch. 288, § 27; 1992, ch. 574, §§ 7, 8; 1999, ch. 520, § 43.

59-4-205. Notice of revocation — Certification to secretary of state — Surrender of certificate — Penalty for failure to surrender.

If the certificate is revoked, the holder of such certificate and the employer of the holder shall each be notified of such revocation, and the department of labor and workforce development shall immediately certify the same to the secretary of state, who shall record the revocation upon a book containing copies of certificates issued, and the holder of the certificate shall immediately surrender the revoked certificate to the department of labor and workforce development, to be turned over to the secretary of state for cancellation. A holder of a revoked certificate who fails or refuses to surrender it is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1915, ch. 169, § 13; Shan., § 3079a104; mod. Code 1932, § 5587; Acts 1953, ch. 86, § 27 (Williams, §§ 5587, 5638.27); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 58-408; Acts 1985, ch. 288, §§ 28, 29; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 2016, ch. 599, § 7.

Compiler’s Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 599, § 7, provided that references to the elevator division, division of mines, labor standards division, and division of boiler and elevator inspection, are to be changed to the department of labor and workforce development as sections are amended and volumes are replaced.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

59-4-206. Lost certificates — Copies.

In case of the loss or destruction of a certificate, the secretary of state may supply a copy thereof to the person losing same upon the payment of fifty cents (50¢); provided, that it shall be shown to the satisfaction of the secretary of state that the loss has actually occurred and the loser was a holder of such certificate.

Acts 1915, ch. 169, § 16; Shan., § 3079a108; mod. Code 1932, § 5591; Acts 1953, ch. 86, § 30 (Williams, §§ 5591, 5638.30); T.C.A., (orig. ed.), § 58-409.

59-4-207. Penalty for forging or falsifying certificates.

Any person who forges or counterfeits a certificate, or knowingly makes or causes to be made any false statement in any certificate or in any official copy of the same, or urges and influences others to do so, or utters or uses any such false certificate or unofficial copy thereof, or makes, gives, utters, produces, or makes use of any false declaration, representation, or statement in any such certificate or copy thereof, or any document containing same, is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1915, ch. 169, § 17; Shan., § 3079a109; Code 1932, § 5592; Acts 1953, ch. 86, § 31 (Williams §§ 5592, 5638.31); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 58-410; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

59-4-208. Registration and certification requirements for mine foremen.

It is unlawful for any person to act as mine foreman unless the person is registered as holder of a certificate of competency as required by this chapter.

It is unlawful for an individual, partnership, firm, or corporation operating a mine or mines in this state to employ any person in the capacity of mine foreman unless the person is registered as a holder of such certificate of competency.

Each mine foreman employed at an underground coal mine shall possess a Class “A” mine foreman certificate.

Each mine foreman employed at an open pit mine, metal mine, or preparation plant shall possess a Class “C” mine foreman certificate.

Acts 1915, ch. 169, §§ 12, 15, 18; Shan., §§ 3079a98, 3079a107, 3079a110; Code 1932, §§ 5581, 5590, 5593; Acts 1947, ch. 217, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 5581; Acts 1951, ch. 245, § 12 (Williams, § 5551); Acts 1953, ch. 86, § 14 (Williams, § 5638.14); modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 58-411; Acts 1985, ch. 288, § 30.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mines and Minerals, § 5.